Washington statutes.
RCW 35.75.020

Use of bicycle paths for other purposes prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person to lead, drive, ride, or propel any team, wagon, animal, or vehicle other than a bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or similar vehicle upon and along any bicycle path constructed within or without the corporate limits of any city or town excepting at suitable crossings to be provided in the construction of such paths. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2002 c 247 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.75.020. Prior: 1899 c 31 s 3; RRS s 9206.]

NOTES:

Legislative review—2002 c 247: See note following RCW 46.04.1695.